Utah statutes.
57-8a-219.   Display of the flag.

(1)  An association may not prohibit a lot owner from displaying a United States flag inside a dwelling or limited common area or on a lot, if the display complies with United States Code, Title 4, Chapter 1, The Flag.

(2)  An association may restrict the display of a flag on the common areas.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

